California statutes. Education Code
The University of California, Los Angeles and the California State University, Dominguez Hills, along with California State University campuses serving the Los Angeles Basin selected by the Trustees of the California State University, shall form a neurodiversity and learning collaborative to do all of the following:

(a) Develop a network of brain researchers and educators to share new knowledge on neurodiversity.

(b) Identify and develop links between brain research and classroom practice.

(c) Create a framework for embedding neurodiversity knowledge into the teacher education programs at the University of California and the California
 State University.

(d) Provide an opportunity for innovative experts in neuroscience and education to collaborate and develop new approaches for teaching and learning based on knowledge gained from brain research around learning differences, such as dyslexia.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 27.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

92667.

(a) (1) The collaborative formed pursuant to Section 92666 shall provide leadership on the development and testing of new classroom interventions and teaching practices for literacy learning issues based on brain research at public schools maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(2) Schools described in paragraph (1) may include schools with existing partnerships with the California State University or the University of California.

(b) The collaborative shall establish an evaluation team, composed of participants from the California State University and the University of California, Los Angeles to measure the impact of the new classroom
 interventions and teaching practices at participating schools pursuant to subdivision (a) and identify which interventions and practices are most effective for neurodiverse learners.

(c) The collaborative may provide stipends for student teachers, teachers, and school leaders who participate in the work described in this section.

(d) The collaborative shall support the creation of professional development modules for current teachers based on the evaluation of tested interventions and practices pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 27.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

92668.

(a) The collaborative formed pursuant to Section 92666 shall support the development of a progressive teacher training curriculum to be integrated into professional preparation programs leading to a preliminary teaching credential, approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, that will have a long-term impact on supporting neurodiverse learners.

(b) The collaborative shall select public postsecondary educational institutions willing to participate voluntarily in implementing and testing the effects of the teacher training curriculum.

(c) The collaborative shall measure the success of the teacher training curriculum and intervention programs and shall share the results
 broadly with educators and policymakers throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 27.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

92669.

(a) The operation of this article is contingent upon the enactment of an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for its purposes.

(b) For purposes of this article, participation of public schools maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall be voluntary.

(c) This article shall not apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make it applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 27.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Expenditures for Undergraduate and Graduate Instruction and Research Activities [92670. - 92670.]

92670.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to ensure that the Legislature has accurate information upon which to base funding decisions relating to the University of California.

(2) The University of California shall report biennially to the Legislature and the Department of Finance, on or before October 1, 2014, and on or before October 1
 of each even-numbered year thereafter, on the total costs of education at the University of California. The amounts included in the reports required by this section shall be based on publicly available information.

(b) The report shall identify the costs of undergraduate education, graduate academic education, graduate professional education, and research activities. All four categories listed in this subdivision shall be reported in total and disaggregated separately by health sciences disciplines, disciplines included in paragraph (13) of subdivision (b) of Section 92675, and all other disciplines. For purposes of this report, research for which a student earns credit toward his or her degree program shall be identified as undergraduate education or graduate education.

(c) The costs reported in the reports required by this section shall be prior year actual expenditures, and shall also be reported by fund source, including all of the following:

(1) State General Fund.

(2) Systemwide tuition and fees.

(3) Nonresident tuition and fees and other student fees.

(4) University of California General Funds, including interest on General Fund balances and the portion of indirect cost recovery and patent royalty income used for core educational purposes.

(d) For any report submitted under this section before January 1, 2017, the costs shall, at a minimum, be reported on a systemwide basis. For any report submitted under this section on or after January 1, 2017, the costs shall be reported on both a systemwide and campus-by-campus basis.

(e) A report prepared under this section on or after January 1, 2017, shall include information on costs, disaggregated by campus, based on the methodology developed by the National Association of College and University Business Officers in its February 2002 report, Explaining College Costs, and other methodologies determined by the university.

(f) A report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the
 Government Code.

(g) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting a report under this section shall be inoperative on January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 802, Sec. 2.   (AB 1655)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.7. Reporting of Performance Measures [92675. - 92675.]

92675.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms are defined as follows:

(1) The “four-year graduation rate” means the percentage of a cohort of undergraduate students who entered the university as freshmen at any campus and graduated from any campus within four years.

(2) The “two-year transfer graduation rate” means the percentage of a cohort of undergraduate students who entered the university at any campus as junior-level transfer students from the California Community Colleges and graduated from any campus within two years.

(3) “Low-income student” means an undergraduate student who has an expected family contribution, as
 defined in subdivision (g) of Section 69432.7, at any time during the student’s matriculation at the institution that would qualify the student to receive a federal Pell Grant. The calculation of a student’s expected family contribution shall be based on the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) application or an application determined by the Student Aid Commission to be equivalent to the FAFSA application submitted by that applicant.

(b) Commencing with the 2013–14 academic year, the University of California shall report, by March 15 of each year, on the following performance measures for the preceding academic year, to inform budget and policy decisions and promote the effective and efficient use of available resources:

(1) The number of transfer students enrolled from the California Community Colleges, and the percentage of California Community College transfer
 students as a proportion of the total number of undergraduate students enrolled.

(2) The number of new transfer students enrolled from the California Community Colleges, and the percentage of new California Community College transfer students as a proportion of the total number of new undergraduate students enrolled.

(3) The number of low-income students enrolled and the percentage of low-income students as a proportion of the total number of undergraduate students enrolled.

(4) The number of new low-income students enrolled and the percentage of new low-income students as a proportion of the total number of new undergraduate students enrolled.

(5) The four-year graduation rate for students who entered the university four years prior and, separately,
 for low-income students in that cohort.

(6) The two-year transfer graduation rate for students who entered the university two years prior and, separately, for low-income students in that cohort.

(7) The number of degree completions, in total and for the following categories:

(A) Freshman entrants.

(B) California Community College transfer students.

(C) Graduate students.

(D) Low-income students.

(8) The percentage of freshman entrants who have earned sufficient course credits by the end of their first year of enrollment to indicate they will graduate within four
 years.

(9) The percentage of California Community College transfer students who have earned sufficient course credits by the end of their first year of enrollment to indicate they will graduate within two years.

(10) For all students, the total amount of funds received from all sources identified in subdivision (c) of Section 92670 for the year, divided by the number of degrees awarded that same year.

(11) For undergraduate students, the total amount of funds received from the sources identified in subdivision (c) of Section 92670 for the year expended for undergraduate education, divided by the number of undergraduate degrees awarded that same year.

(12) The average number of University of California course credits and total course credits, including
 credit accrued at other institutions, accumulated by all undergraduate students who graduated, and separately for freshman entrants and California Community College transfer students.

(13) (A) The number of degree completions in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) fields, in total, and separately for undergraduate students, graduate students, and low-income students.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “STEM fields” include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following: computer and information sciences, engineering and engineering technologies, biological and biomedical sciences, mathematics and statistics, physical sciences, and science technologies.

(c) Commencing with the 2017–18 academic year, the University of California shall include in the report
 described in subdivision (b) goals for the three academic years immediately following the academic year of the report for each of the performance measures listed under that subdivision.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature review these performance measures in a collaborative process with the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, individuals with expertise in statewide accountability efforts, the University of California, the California State University, and, for purposes of data integrity and consistency, the California Community Colleges, and consider any recommendations for their modification and refinement. It is further the intent of the Legislature that any modification or refinement of these measures be guided by the legislative intent expressed in Section 66010.93.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 23, Sec. 19.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.8. Admission of California Resident Students [92680. - 92680.]

92680.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that pupils who are enrolled in schools identified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41580 receive additional support to increase the number of these pupils who are admitted to, and enroll at, the University of California and who successfully complete an undergraduate degree within four academic years of freshman admission.

(b) The University of California shall approve a plan, including a timeline, to do all of the following:

(1) Identify, in the files for each applicant for freshman admission, whether the applicant is enrolled in a school identified
 on the list developed by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41580.

(2) (A) Provide direction to each campus regarding supplemental consideration in the admission process for pupils who are enrolled in schools identified pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41580 that comply with university policy.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, all pupils enrolled in schools identified pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41580 shall meet the same admission requirements as pupils who are enrolled in high schools not identified pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41580.

(3) Increase, at each campus and in each academic year, beginning in the 2016–17 academic year, the number of California resident freshmen admits, including students meeting the requirements of Section 68130.5, who are enrolled at
 a school identified by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41580. It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California examine its practices to encourage more pupils who are enrolled at schools identified by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41580 and who are admitted to the university to enroll at the university.

(4) Expand services and resources to be provided specifically for students who entered as freshmen and who were previously enrolled in a school identified by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41580.

(c) No later than December 15, 2016, the university shall submit to the Director of Finance and the Legislature an evaluation of the costs and benefits of providing application fee waivers to applicants who are enrolled in schools identified by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (g)
 of Section 41580.

(d) Commencing in 2017, no later than November 30 of each year, the university shall report to the Director of Finance and to the Legislature the number of pupils who attended a school identified by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 41580 and were admitted to the university, and the number of those students who enrolled, disaggregated by campus.

(e) This section is operative if funds are appropriated in the Budget Act of 2016 to the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 26.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.9. County of San Diego Coastal Erosion Research Program [92685. - 92685.]

92685.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Scripps Institution of Oceanography at the University of California, San Diego, shall conduct research on coastal cliff landslides and erosion in the County of San Diego. As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this section, the research conducted pursuant to this section shall involve both of the following:

(1) Developing a bluff failure database using historical records combined with analysis of recent and future coastal survey data. This database shall be used to establish landslide size frequency statistics, quantify failure rates, and identify erosion hot spots.

(2) Conducting real-time measurements of land deformation, to identify and analyze
 conditions that precede catastrophic bluff failure, on the following sites:

(A) Beacons Beach in the City of Encinitas.

(B) The City of Del Mar.

(C) San Elijo State Beach in the Cardiff area of the City of Encinitas.

(b) (1) The research described in subdivision (a) shall be completed no later than January 1, 2026. No later than March 30, 2026, the Scripps Institution of Oceanography shall, as a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this section, provide a report to the Legislature with recommendations for developing a coastal cliff landslide and erosion early warning system based on available research.

(2) A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be
 submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on March 30, 2030, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(c) The Regents of the University of California and its employees, acting in good faith, shall not be civilly liable for any harm resulting from measurements, predictions, or warnings regarding bluff failure, cliff landslides, or erosion contained in the report or from the research described in subdivision (a) or related to the recommendations described in subdivision (b). This subdivision does not absolve the Regents of the University of California and its employees from liability under existing law for damages as a result of acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

(d) The limitation of liability in subdivision (c) applies only to the Regents of the University of California and its employees. It does not apply to any other state or local agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 80, Sec. 1.   (AB 72)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. California-China Climate Institute [92687. - 92687.]

92687.

(a) (1) Subject to the availability of private funds provided for purposes of this article, the Regents of the University of California may establish the California-China Climate Institute, a University of California-wide initiative to accelerate climate action through cooperative efforts and exchange between two of the world’s largest economic powers.

(2) The institute shall work closely with University of California campuses, departments, and leaders to accomplish its work.

(3) The institute shall operate in partnership with the Institute of Climate Change and Sustainable Development at
 Tsinghua University and other entities and institutions in China and California.

(4) The institute will, to the extent possible, receive guidance and support from expert policy, government, business, academic, and climate leaders and advisory committees, including, but not necessarily limited to, the following state entities:

(A) The California State Assembly.

(B) The California State Senate.

(C) The office of the Governor.

(D) The California Environmental Protection Agency.

(E) The Natural Resources Agency.

(F) The University of California.

(G) The Department of Food and Agriculture.

(b) The duties of the institute shall include all of the following:

(1) Fostering collaboration among government, business, academic institutions, and civil society to inform and shape national and subnational climate policy and advance the goals of the Paris Agreement.

(2) Advancing joint policy research on major climate issues, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) Low-carbon transportation and zero-emission vehicles.

(B) Carbon pricing.

(C) Climate adaptation and resilience.

(D) Sustainable land use and climate-smart agriculture.

(E) Carbon capture and storage.

(F) Long-term climate goal setting and policy enforcement.

(3) Supporting high-level subnational climate dialogue between top government, business, and climate leaders from throughout the United States and China with respect to climate policy, investment, and finance.

(4) Providing training to Californian and Chinese researchers, scientists, technical experts, policymakers, and other leaders to advance critical climate and environmental policies, including, but not necessarily limited to, air quality, carbon pricing, carbon emissions, clean energy, and innovation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 227, Sec. 1.   (AB 39)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Lunar New Year Holiday [92689. - 92689.]

92689.

(a) Each campus of the University of California is requested to be authorized to observe the date corresponding with the second new moon following the winter solstice, or the third new moon following the winter solstice should an intercalary month intervene, known as “Lunar New Year,” as a holiday, and to be closed on that day.
 The campus is requested to be authorized to replace observing another prescribed holiday with observing Lunar New Year as a holiday. If the campus observes the Lunar New Year holiday and Lunar New Year falls on another prescribed holiday that is not being replaced by the Lunar New Year holiday, the campus is requested to observe the preceding or following weekday as the Lunar New Year holiday.

(b) If a campus of the University of California observes the Lunar New Year holiday pursuant to subdivision (a), employees of the campus are requested to be entitled to a paid holiday on
 that day if they are in a paid status during any portion of the working day immediately preceding or succeeding the Lunar New Year holiday.

(c) If this section conflicts with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if those provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget
 Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 972, Sec. 2.   (AB 2883)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. The Center for Cooperatives [92690. - 92698.]

92690.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) That California consumers enjoy the economic benefits of a substantial cooperative business sector. An estimated one million people participate in a diversity of consumer cooperatives that includes, but is not limited to, housing, child care, food, insurance and health care, student, rural electric, senior citizen, cable, and funeral cooperatives, as well as employee-owned arts and crafts cooperatives and other small business cooperatives. Credit unions, as financial cooperatives, provide services to over 6.2 million members.

In addition, over 40,000 California farmers belong to agricultural cooperatives which produce and market over six billion dollars ($6,000,000,000) of food and fiber products annually.

(b) That land grant universities of this nation, including the University of California, have a long tradition of providing research, educational, and extension programs of direct interest to cooperatives.

(c) That public understanding of the nature and role of cooperatives is minimal. In general, the public does not understand how the cooperative form of business structure is being utilized for their benefit.

(d) That public understanding about the benefits of the cooperative form of business could be greatly improved through a coordinated effort by the University of California and other institutions of higher education to focus on the role of cooperatives in the California economy.

(e) That in the fast changing world economic environment it is important to California that its cooperatives remain a dynamic sector within the state’s economy. In order to enhance this sector’s development the state is asked to support the establishment of a Center for Cooperatives.

(f) That the establishment of a Center for Cooperatives would help to meet the growing need for information, knowledge, and the professional skills necessary to increase the competitiveness of California’s cooperatives in the state, national, and world trade and economy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 668, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

92691.

In order to facilitate the development of cooperatives in the business and education sectors, the University of California is requested to establish a Center for Cooperatives. The university is further requested to give careful consideration to locating the center at the University of California, Davis, due to the demonstrated leadership role of that campus in providing research, education, and extension services to cooperatives. It is the intent of the Legislature that the center be interdisciplinary in nature and be administered by the university through the appointment of a director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

92692.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the center be operated by the University of California to do the following:

(a) Assist cooperatives in the state through the provision of the following: 

(1) Board management and staff training.

(2) Technical assistance regarding startups, ongoing operations, membership development, and new initiatives.

(3) Advice regarding capitalization, marketing, merchandising, business, economic development, and financial management strategies.

(b) Serve as a catalyst between the Land Grant University, other higher education programs, and cooperative leaders in the development and support of education, research, and public outreach programs of direct benefit and interest to cooperatives and their members.

(c) Provide access to market development and changes through industry focused knowledge to the boards, officers, committees, management, and staffs of cooperatives.

(d) Strengthen the capacity of California’s cooperatives to compete effectively and therefore, create employment opportunities for both the rural and urban population in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1198, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

92693.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the center support research, education, and extension activities that advance the body of knowledge concerning cooperatives in general and address the needs of California’s agricultural and nonagricultural cooperatives such as:

(a) Support for teaching programs at the graduate and undergraduate levels.

(b) Support for research addressing economic, marketing, social, technology development, and other issues relating to cooperatives.

(c) Dissemination of information on existing programs, services, and publications available to cooperatives through federal, state, university, and public sector sources.

(d) Development and dissemination of education materials relating to cooperatives.

(e) Coordination of meetings, conferences, seminars, and related education programs for cooperative leaders, boards of directors, managers, members of cooperatives, and others.

(f) Encouragement of greater interest in cooperatives by the academic community through student involvement, internships, support of visiting scholars, and other means.

(g) Support strengthening the economic role of cooperatives in state, national, and international trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1198, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

92694.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the President of the University of California, or his or her designee, appoint an advisory board to the center.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) The advisory board be composed of a majority of individuals who are members of agricultural or nonagricultural cooperatives, with the two sectors being equally represented, as well as, composed of individuals representing institutions of higher education, government, and the general public who are knowledgeable about cooperatives.

(2) The duties of the advisory board include recommending goals, objectives, and priorities for the center and reviewing center activities.

(3) To the extent practicable, the advisory board recommend, and the center strive to undertake, a balanced program of activities that are directly beneficial to agricultural and nonagricultural cooperatives, and representative of the diversity of both cooperative sectors.

(4) The advisory board consider the relative economic impact of cooperatives in California and the service to the public in making its recommendations.

(5) The members of the advisory board serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with applicable regulations and guidelines of the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1198, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

92695.

It is the intent of the Legislature, and subject to the availability of funds, that qualified institutions of higher education, organizations, and individuals, as determined by the president, or his or her designee, in consultation with the advisory board, be eligible to participate in a competitive grant program to assist in carrying out Sections 92692 and 92693.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 668, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

92696.

It is further the intent of the Legislature that the Center for Cooperatives be funded by a variety of sources which may include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Funds derived from special fund accounts.

(2) Public and private funds secured through cooperative research agreements from entities such as the Agricultural Cooperative Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(3) Funds currently available to the university which are directed in the interest of cooperatives.

(4) Legislative appropriations to enhance the awareness and involvement of various minorities in cooperative business enterprises.

(5) Income from courses, seminars, publications, and contractual services.

(6) Contributions from cooperatives and other associated business organizations.

(7) Grants and endowments received from private foundations, government agencies, and other public or private sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 668, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

92698.

No provision of this chapter shall apply to the University of California unless the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, makes that provision applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1198, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Community-Based Health Professions Education Partnership Program [92720. - 92726.]

92720.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares, as follows:

(a) There is an inadequate supply of physicians, family nurse practitioners, and physician assistants who provide primary care to individuals and families in low-income urban and rural areas of California.

(b) Current training for health professionals, which occurs almost exclusively in clinics and hospitals, rarely provides students with opportunities to provide community-based medical care to families in low-income neighborhoods. As a result, relatively few health professionals choose to practice in low-income neighborhoods after completion of their training.

(c) Most medical graduates are unprepared to deal with the complex interwoven social, cultural, economic, environmental, and educational aspects of disease prevention and health promotion. As a result, health professionals frequently have limited impact on the prevention or treatment of entrenched community health problems, including teen pregnancy, substance abuse, and domestic violence.

(d) Community-based education for health professionals has proven successful in other states, including Washington and Kentucky, in doing all of the following:

(1) Increasing the number of primary care health professionals practicing in low-income areas.

(2) Promoting the use of multi-disciplinary teams composed of health and human services professionals to jointly address community health problems.

(e) It is in the state’s best interest that California medical schools be encouraged to develop coursework and practice for community-based education as a part of professional training for physicians, nurse practitioners, and physician assistants. It is further in the state’s best interest that community-based education programs be evaluated to determine their effects on increasing the number of health care professionals practicing in low-income, medically underserved communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 648, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

92721.

(a) There is hereby established the Community-Based Health Professions Education Partnership Program to be administered by the University of California.

(b) The purpose of the program shall be to encourage the development of undergraduate medical and other health professional clerkships in primary care that combine health education, human services, and community involvement. The Legislature’s goal, through these clerkships, is to increase the number of medical students who choose to enter residencies in primary care and to increase the number of health professionals who practice in primary care in low-income communities and medically underserved areas after their training programs are completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 648, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

92722.

The university is requested to incorporate the following into the program:

(a) A primary care clerkship as part of the undergraduate curriculum.

(b) Opportunities for nurse practitioners and physician assistants that combine clinical experience with participation in multidisciplinary teams that include other health, education, and human services professionals charged with identifying and addressing community health problems.

(c) Opportunities for students to be exposed to a comprehensive array of primary care health services—curative and preventive medicine, health promotion, and rehabilitation.

(d) Opportunities that allow participants to serve as members of a multiservice health and human resource committee, or a comparable arrangement, that includes members from other public and private human services and educational agencies, for the purpose of offering integrated, comprehensive health, education, and human services to children and their families living in the community.

(e) Opportunities that place students in community or neighborhood primary care clinics in low-income communities, as determined by the university, or medically underserved areas, as determined by the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, and that have a working relationship with an advisory board that is made up of representatives from the community being served.

(f) Community involvement in the design and operation of the clerkship program, based on the identification of community needs and resources.

(g) Culturally appropriate program governance, staff, and services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 648, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

92723.

The university is requested to track and report all of the following factors:

(a) The percentage of medical students participating, after residency, in primary care in low-income communities, as determined by the university, or medically underserved areas, as determined by the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(b) The rate of nurse practitioners and physician assistants who, after training, are employed in primary care practice or low-income communities, as determined by the university, or medically underserved areas, as determined by the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(c) Whether the program has resulted in an increase in the rate of graduates practicing in low-income communities, as determined by the university, or medically underserved areas, as determined by the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 648, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

92724.

The university shall evaluate and report all of the following to the Legislature and the Governor, commencing July 1, 1997, and biennially thereafter:

(a) The percentage of medical student participants in the program who do either, or both, of the following:

(1) Choose residencies in primary care.

(2) After residency, practice in primary care.

(b) The utilization of primary care medical facilities included in the program.

(c) The historical utilization of emergency room facilities in neighborhoods served by the program one year prior to and one year after the implementation of the program.

(d) The cost of providing health services to families served by the program.

(e) The effectiveness of clinical and multidisciplinary training as components of professional education for physicians and surgeons, nurse practitioners, and physician assistants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 648, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

92725.

(a) The program shall be considered successful if, after implementation of the program, all of the following occur:

(1) There is a 10 percent or greater increase in the rate of program graduates who choose to practice primary care over the average number of program graduates who chose to practice primary care during the previous five years.

(2) There is a decrease in the use of emergency room facilities for nonemergency procedures by persons served by the program from the use of emergency room facilities for nonemergency procedures during the previous five years.

(3) Families served by the program have received expanded health services without an increase in per capita health costs.

(b) Based on the evaluation of the program by the university pursuant to Section 92724, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, in consultation with the California Healthcare Workforce Policy Commission, shall recommend to the Legislature on or before January 1, 1998, whether funding for the program should be expanded to include other medical schools.

(c) If the recommendation is made to expand the program pursuant to subdivision (b), it is the intent of the Legislature that the program be expanded to allow private medical schools and private schools of nursing to participate in the program in order to permit substantially all students who are training to become physicians and surgeons, nurse practitioners, or physician assistants to receive a portion of their training in a community-based education program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 582, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

92726.

This chapter shall not apply to the University of California unless the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make it applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 648, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Substance Abuse Research [92820. - 92820.]

92820.
